Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-678
Short-time compensation program; plan;
modification; request; decision; employer; report.

(1) An employer may request a modification
of an approved plan by filing a written request with the commissioner. The
request shall identify the specific provisions proposed to be modified and
provide an explanation of why the proposed modification is appropriate for
the short-time compensation plan. The commissioner shall approve or disapprove
the proposed modification in writing within thirty days after receipt and
promptly communicate the decision to the employer.

(2) The commissioner
may approve a request for modification of the plan based on conditions that
have changed since the plan was approved if the modification is consistent
with and supports the purposes for which the plan was initially approved.
A modification does not extend the expiration date of the original plan, and
the commissioner shall promptly notify the employer whether the plan modification
has been approved and, if approved, the effective date of the modification.

(3) An employer
is not required to request approval of a plan modification from the commissioner
if the change is not substantial, but the employer must report every change
to the plan to the commissioner promptly and in writing. The commissioner
may terminate an employer's plan if the employer fails to meet this reporting
requirement. If the commissioner determines that the reported change is substantial,
the commissioner shall require the employer to request a modification to the
plan.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 19.
October 1, 2016